Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
As used in sections 1 to 12 of this 2023 Act:
(1) “Certified advocate” and “qualified victim services program” have the meanings given
those terms in ORS 40.264.
(2) “Institution of higher education” has the meaning given that term in ORS 350.253.
(3) “Reporting  party” means a student or employee at an institution of higher education
who reports having experienced an incident of sexual misconduct to the institution.
(4) “Sexual misconduct” means an incident  of sexual harassment, sexual violence, inti-
mate partner violence, domestic violence, sexual exploitation, stalking, harassment  or vi-
olence based on sexual orientation or gender  identity or expression, or other gender-based
harassment or violence.
(5) “Student” means an individual who:
(a) Is enrolled or who is seeking to enroll  in a credit-bearing program at an institution
of higher education, whether part-time, full-time or as an extension student; or
(b) Who has taken a leave  of absence or withdrawn from the institution of higher edu-
cation after reporting an incident of sexual misconduct to the Title IX coordinator at the
institution.
(6) “Trauma-informed response” means  a response involving an understanding of the
complexities of intimate partner violence, domestic  violence, sexual assault and stalking
through training centered on the neurobiological impact of trauma, the influence of  societal
myths and stereotypes surrounding the causes and impacts of trauma, an understanding of
perpetration methodology and knowledge of how to conduct an effective investigation.
SECTION 2.
(1) The Sexual Misconduct Survey Council is established, consisting of 19
voting members and four nonvoting members.
(2) The four nonvoting members of the council shall be appointed as follows:
(a) The President  of the Senate shall appoint two nonvoting members from among
members of the Senate; and
(b) The Speaker of the House of  Representatives shall appoint two nonvoting members
from among members of the House of Representatives.
(3)(a) The executive director of the  Higher Education Coordinating Commission, in con-
sultation with the Attorney General’s Sexual Assault Task Force and the Oregon Coalition
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 1
Against Domestic and  Sexual Violence, shall appoint the following 17 voting members of the
council:
(A) One individual who represents a public university listed in ORS 352.002;
(B) One individual who represents a private institution of higher education;
(C) One individual who represents a community college operated under  ORS chapter 341;
(D) One Title IX coordinator from an institution of higher  education that awards
bachelor’s degrees;
(E) One individual from the Oregon Coalition Against Domestic and Sexual Violence;
(F) One representative from the Attorney General’s Sexual Assault Task Force;
(G) One individual from a national coalition focused  on ending campus sexual violence,
including but not limited to the Every Voice Coalition;
(H) Two students who are enrolled at a public university  listed in ORS 352.002 and who
are affiliated with  a group or organization that advocates for multicultural, diversity or
antidiscrimination training;
(I) Two students  who are enrolled at a private institution of higher education and who
are affiliated with  a group or organization that advocates for multicultural, diversity or
antidiscrimination training;
(J) Two students who are enrolled  at a community college operated under ORS chapter
341 and who are affiliated with a  group or organization that advocates for multicultural, di-
versity or antidiscrimination training;
(K) One  individual who has demonstrated experience in the development and design of
sexual misconduct climate surveys;
(L) One individual who has demonstrated expertise in statistics, data  analytics or
econometrics and experience in higher education survey analysis;
(M) One individual who is a medical or  mental health care professional with experience
working with victims of trauma at a health services program at an institution  of higher ed-
ucation; and
(N) One individual  from a community-based domestic and sexual violence advocacy
agency.
(b) An individual appointed under paragraph (a)(E) to (G) of this subsection may appoint
a designee to serve on the council in place of the individual appointed.
(4) In addition to the individuals described in subsections (2) and (3) of this section, the
Attorney General and the executive director of the commission, or the designee  of the At-
torney General or the executive director of the commission, shall serve as  voting members
of the council.
(5) In appointing members to the council, the appointing authorities shall:
(a) Seek to ensure that membership on the council is reflective  of the gender, racial and
geographic diversity of Oregon; and
(b) Seek to appoint individuals with a background, education  or experience in the fields
of public health, survey design or Title IX of the Education Amendments Act  of 1972, 20
U.S.C. 1681 to 1688, as amended.
(6)(a) The term of office  of each individual appointed to the council under subsections (2)
and (3) of this section is two years. Before the expiration of the  term of a member, the ap-
pointing authority shall appoint a successor. A member is eligible for reappointment.
(b) If  there is a vacancy for any cause, the appointing authority shall make an appoint-
ment to become immediately effective for the unfinished term.
(7) The council shall  select one or more of its voting members as chairperson or as
cochairpersons.
(8) A majority of the voting members of the council constitutes a quorum for the trans-
action of business.
(9) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall provide staff support to  the
council.
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 2
(10)(a) Except as provided in paragraphs (b) and (c) of this subsection, members of the
council are not entitled to compensation for their service on the council.
(b) To the extent moneys are available, members of the council who are  not members
of the Legislative Assembly shall be  reimbursed for actual and necessary travel and other
expenses incurred by the members in the performance of official  duties in the manner and
amount as provided in ORS 292.495.
(c) Legislative members of the council shall be entitled to  payment of compensation and
expense reimbursement  under ORS 171.072, payable from funds appropriated to the Legisla-
tive Assembly.
SECTION 3. (1) At least  once every two years, the Sexual Misconduct Survey Council
established under section 2 of this 2023 Act shall:
(a) Develop a base survey for distribution to institutions of higher education; and
(b) Provide each institution of higher education with any  recommendations regarding use
of the survey, including but not  limited to additional content that could be added, the timing
for conducting the survey, recommendations  for achieving statistically valid response rates
and how the survey results should be interpreted.
(2) In developing the base survey required under subsection (1)  of this section, the
council shall:
(a) Utilize best practices from peer-reviewed  research and consult with individuals with
expertise in the development and use of sexual misconduct climate surveys by  post-
secondary institutions of education;
(b) Review sexual misconduct climate surveys that  have been developed and previously
used by post-secondary institutions of education;
(c) Provide  opportunities for written comment from organizations that work directly
with victims of sexual misconduct in order to  ensure the adequacy and appropriateness of
the proposed content;
(d) Consult with institutions of higher education on strategies for optimizing the  effec-
tiveness of the survey;
(e) Account for the diverse needs and differences of institutions of higher education;
(f) Provide opportunities for student feedback through optional comment boxes  at the
end of the survey and by providing a time and space for  students to comment to the council
on what could be done to improve  the sexual misconduct climate survey described in section
4 of this 2023 Act so that the results of  the survey convey an accurate representation of
happenings on campus; and
(g) Use a trauma-informed framework.
(3) The base survey shall gather data on topics including but not limited to:
(a) The  number and type of incidents, both reported and unreported, of sexual miscon-
duct at the institution of higher education;
(b) When incidents of sexual misconduct occurred, without requiring  a specific date or
time;
(c) Whether incidents of sexual misconduct occurred on campus, off campus, overseas
or virtually;
(d) If the sexual misconduct was perpetrated by a student, faculty  member, nonfaculty
staff member, third-party vendor to the institution of higher education or other individual;
(e) How aware students are of institutional policies and  procedures related to campus
sexual misconduct;
(f) Whether a student  reported sexual misconduct, with specific follow-up questions re-
garding:
(A) For  students who reported sexual misconduct, whether the report was made to a
campus resource or law enforcement agency; and
(B) For students who did not report sexual misconduct, why the student chose  not to
make a report;
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 3
(g) Whether students who experienced  sexual misconduct disclosed the sexual miscon-
duct to a friend, peer, family member, faculty or nonfaculty staff member,  campus resource
or law enforcement official;
(h) For a student who reported sexual misconduct:
(A) Whether the student  was informed of or referred to local, state, campus or other
resources, or to victim support services, including but not limited to appropriate  medical
care, mental health counseling and legal services; and
(B) Whether the student  was provided with protection from retaliation, access to
institution-based supportive measures or  institution-based accommodations and criminal
justice remedies;
(i) For a student who experienced assault,  the types of contextual factors that were
present during the assault, including but not limited to the involvement of force, incapaci-
tation, coercion, drugs or alcohol;
(j) Demographic information that could be used to identify at-risk groups, including but
not limited to sex, race, ethnicity, national origin, economic status, disability status, gender
identity, immigration status and sexual orientation;
(k) Perceptions of campus safety among members of the campus community;
(L) Student confidence in the institution’s ability to protect against  and respond to inci-
dents of sexual misconduct;
(m) Whether students who reported sexual misconduct took a leave of absence from  the
institution, or considered transferring to another institution or withdrawing;
(n) Whether students who experienced sexual misconduct withdrew from any classes or
were placed on academic probation;
(o) Whether students experienced any financial impacts from sexual misconduct or the
institution’s response to a report of sexual misconduct;
(p) Whether students experienced any  negative health impacts from sexual misconduct
or the institution’s  response to a report of sexual misconduct, including but not limited to
post-traumatic stress disorder, anxiety, depression, chronic pain or eating disorders;
(q) Community attitudes  towards sexual misconduct, including but not limited to
students’ willingness to intervene as bystanders; and
(r) Any other questions the council determines would be beneficial.
(4) A base survey developed under this section:
(a) Shall:
(A) Include a “decline to state” and “not applicable” option for each question;
(B) Be offered to all  students enrolled at the institution of higher education, including
students who are on a leave of absence or studying abroad;
(C) Be created taking into account all reasonable measures to ensure that an  adequate,
random and representative sample of students complete the survey; and
(D) Be  administered online, with reasonable accommodations provided to all students in
order to ensure accessibility; and
(b) May not require the disclosure of any personally identifiable information.
SECTION 4.
(1) At least once every two years, each institution of higher education shall
conduct a sexual misconduct climate survey of all students enrolled at the institution.
(2)(a) A survey conducted under this section shall include:
(A) The most recent base survey provided by the  Sexual Misconduct Survey Council un-
der section 3 of this 2023 Act; and
(B) Any additional campus-specific questions  chosen by the institution, provided that the
additional questions do not:
(i) Require the disclosure of any personally identifiable information; and
(ii) Are not objectively traumatizing for victims of sexual misconduct.
(b) The council may review any questions that are added by an  institution under para-
graph (a)(B) of  this subsection to ensure that the questions do not violate the requirements
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 4
set forth in paragraphs (a)(B)(i) or (ii) of this subsection. If the council determines that an
institution has included questions that violate paragraphs (a)(B)(i)  or (ii) of this subsection
the council, and any appropriate experts appointed by the council, shall assist the institution
in developing appropriate campus-specific questions.
(3) No later than 120 days after  completing a survey under this section, each institution
of higher education shall:
(a) Submit an aggregate summary of the results  to the Higher Education Coordinating
Commission; and
(b) Post on the institution’s website in an easily accessible manner:
(A) A summary of the results of the survey;
(B) Any annual security reports required to be reported under federal law, including but
not limited to the Annual Security Report required to be reported under the Clery Act  of
1990 (P.L. 101-542), as amended; and
(C) A link to the data repository for summaries of sexual  misconduct climate surveys
established by the commission under section 5 of this 2023 Act.
SECTION 5.
(1) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission shall establish a  data
repository for all summaries of sexual misconduct  climate surveys conducted by institutions
of higher education and submitted to the commission under section 4 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The data repository established under this section must:
(a) Be made available to the  public in an easily accessible manner on the website of the
commission; and
(b) Except as provided in  subsection (3) of this section, include all sexual misconduct
climate survey data received by the commission.
(3) Prior to making the data of any sexual misconduct climate survey the commission
receives publicly available, the commission shall ensure that the data is anonymized and does
not contain any personally  identifiable information. The commission may alter the data it
receives to the degree necessary to ensure conformity with this subsection.
(4) The commission shall adopt  rules for the dissemination and collection of sexual mis-
conduct climate surveys at  institutions of higher education. In adopting these rules, the
commission shall seek to promote effective solicitation that will achieve the highest  practi-
cable response rate,  collection and publication of statistical information from institutions of
higher education.
SECTION 6.
(1)(a) Except as provided in paragraph (b) of this subsection, each institution
of higher education shall employ at least one certified advocate as part of a  institution-based
qualified victim services program.
(b) An institution of higher education  is not required to employ a certified advocate if the
institution:
(A)(i) Does not have an institution-based qualified victim services program; or
(ii) Has fewer than 1,000 enrolled students who reside on campus; and
(B)(i) Partners with a local victim advocacy organization to provide a certified advocate;
(ii) Ensures that the certified advocate has on-campus office hours; and
(iii) Ensures that the services of the certified advocate are  provided without charge to
enrolled students.
(2) A certified advocate employed by an institution of higher education  under this section
shall be appointed based on the individual’s experience and demonstrated ability to effectively
provide victim services related to sexual misconduct and:
(a) May not:
(A) Be a student of the institution;
(B) Be a Title IX coordinator for the institution;
(C) Be an authorized administrator of disciplinary processes on behalf of the institution;
(D) Be a member of campus police or law enforcement; or
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 5
(E) Have any additional  job responsibilities that could create a conflict of interest, in-
cluding but not limited to being a general counsel, director of athletics, dean  of students,
clergy member, or any employee who serves on a judicial or hearing board or to whom an
appeal regarding an allegation of sexual misconduct may be made; and
(b) Shall receive training:
(A) Required to be a certified advocate;
(B) On the requirements of Title IX  of the Education Amendments Act of 1972, 20 U.S.C.
1681 to 1688, as amended;
(C) On the policies of the  institution of higher education relating to sexual misconduct;
and
(D) On trauma-informed response.
(3) A certified advocate who is employed under this section shall:
(a) Provide confidential services to students and inform students  of all information re-
quired to be provided under ORS 350.253 and 350.255;
(b) Provide written notification to all institution staff involved in providing  or enforcing
supportive measures or accommodations of the respective duties of these staff members;
(c) If directed by a student, assist the student  in contacting campus police or local law
enforcement agencies to make a report;
(d) Notify students of  their rights, and the responsibilities of the institution, regarding
protection orders, no contact orders and any other lawful  ordered issued by the institution
or by a criminal, civil or tribal court;
(e) Be subject to privilege as a certified advocate under ORS 40.264;
(f) Coordinate with on-campus sexual  misconduct response resources and any
community-based domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency with  which the institution
has entered into a memorandum of understanding under section 7 of this 2023 Act  within a
reasonable time after being designated as a certified advocate; and
(g) If requested by signed  written consent from a student, assist the student with coor-
dinating on-campus supports and supports available with any community-based domestic and
sexual violence advocacy agency with which the institution has entered into a  memorandum
of understanding under section 7 of this 2023 Act.
(4) A certified advocate employed under this section:
(a) If requested by a student, may attend an  administrative or institution-based adjudi-
cation proceeding as the advocate or support person for the student;
(b) May not:
(A) Be required to report an incident to the institution or  a law enforcement agency
unless otherwise required to do so by state or federal law;
(B) Disclose confidential information, including but not limited to the name, contact in-
formation or any  personally identifiable information of a student or any information on the
sexual misconduct, without the prior written  consent of the student who provided the in-
formation to the certified advocate;
(C) Provide services to both the  reporting party and the responding party of the same
sexual misconduct incident; or
(D) Act as a counselor or therapist.
(5) Nothing in this section  may be construed to limit either party’s right of cross exam-
ination of the certified  advocate in a criminal or civil proceeding if the advocate testifies
after written consent has been given.
(6) Providing notice to a certified advocate of an alleged act of sexual misconduct  or an
advocate’s performance of a service  under this section may not be considered actual or
constructive notice to the institution of higher education of the alleged act.
(7) If a conflict  of interest arises for an institution of higher education in which a certi-
fied advocate is advocating for a  student’s need for sexual misconduct crisis services or for
campus resources or law  enforcement services, the institution may not discipline, penalize
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 6
or otherwise retaliate against the  certified advocate for representing the interest of the re-
porting party.
SECTION 7. (1) Except as provided in subsection (4) of this section, each institution of
higher education shall enter into and maintain a  memorandum of understanding with a
community-based domestic and  sexual violence advocacy agency that is in the same county
as the institution.
(2) The memorandum of understanding entered into under this section shall  ensure that
the community-based domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency will:
(a) Assist in  developing the institution’s policies, programming and training regarding
sexual misconduct that involves students and employees;
(b) Provide an accessible off-campus alternative where students  and employees of the
institution can receive free and confidential  sexual misconduct crisis services, including but
not limited to access to a sexual assault nurse examiner, if available, and to  domestic vi-
olence crisis services in response to sexual misconduct;
(c) Ensure that a student or employee of the institution can  access free and confidential
counseling and advocacy services either on campus or off campus; and
(d) Ensure cooperation and training between the institution and the community-based
domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency to ensure an understanding of the roles that
the institution or center should  play in responding to reports and disclosures of sexual mis-
conduct against students and employees of the institution and  the institution’s protocols for
providing support and services to students  and employees who have been the victims of
sexual misconduct.
(3)(a) A memorandum of understanding entered into under this section may include an
agreement, including a fee structure, between the community-based domestic and  sexual vi-
olence advocacy agency and the institution of  higher education for the provision of confi-
dential victim services.
(b) As used in  this subsection, “confidential victim services” means case consultation and
training fees for certified advocates, consultation fees for  the development and implementa-
tion of student education and prevention programs, the development  of staff training and
prevention curriculum  and confidential on-site office space for a representative from a
community-based domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency to  meet with students or
employees of the institution of higher education.
(4) Notwithstanding subsection (1) of this section:
(a) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission may waive the requirements of  this
section if the commission determines that, despite reasonable efforts, an institution of
higher education was unable  to enter into a memorandum of understanding with a
community-based domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency.
(b) This section does not apply to a satellite  campus or branch campus of an institution
of higher education if the satellite campus or branch campus has 1,000  or fewer enrolled
students who reside on campus.
SECTION 8.
(1)(a) A reporting party or a witness who requests an investigation  of sexual
misconduct may not be subjected  to a disciplinary proceeding or sanction for violating the
institution of higher education’s student conduct policy related to drug  or alcohol use, tres-
passing or unauthorized entry of school facilities or  other violations of a school policy or
code of conduct that is  discovered in connection with the alleged sexual misconduct unless
the institution determines that the  report was not made in good faith or that the violation
of the policy was an egregious violation.
(b) As used in this subsection, an “egregious violation” includes but  is not limited to
taking an action that places the health and safety of another individual at risk.
(2) If the code of conduct of an  institution of higher education prohibits sexual activity
or certain forms of sexual activity, including but not limited to same-gender  relationships
or sexual activity, the institution may not take disciplinary action against:
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 7
(a) Individuals who report sexual misconduct or  nonharassing sexual activity related to
sexual misconduct that is discovered during  an investigation into reported sexual miscon-
duct; or
(b) Other  nonharassing sexual activity that is discovered during an investigation into an
allegation of sexual misconduct.
(3) In any instance  in which disciplinary action is taken against an individual who has
reported sexual misconduct, the institution  of higher education shall review the disciplinary
action to determine  if there is a link between the disclosed sexual misconduct and the mis-
conduct that led to the reporting party’s being disciplined.
SECTION 9. (1) In addition to any requirements set forth in ORS 350.253 and 350.255, each
institution of higher education shall:
(a) Receive guidance from  the Title IX coordinator of the institution, local law enforce-
ment, violence prevention specialists, public health specialists, other  individuals with expe-
rience identifying protective and risk factors related to violence and the  community-based
domestic and sexual violence advocacy agency with which the institution entered  into a
memorandum of understanding under section 7 of this 2023 Act; and
(b) Use the  guidance received under paragraph (a) of this subsection to establish a
trauma-informed, gender-inclusive sexual  misconduct primary prevention and awareness
training that must be attended annually by each student and employee of the institution.
(2) Trainings provided under this section:
(a) Must be accessible to individuals with a disability;
(b) Must  be culturally responsive and address the unique experiences and challenges
faced by students based on race, color, ethnicity, national origin, religion,  economic status,
disability status, immigration status, sexual  orientation, gender identity and pregnancy or
parenting status; and
(c) Must include:
(A) An explanation of consent as it applies to sexual activity and sexual relationships;
(B) The role drugs and alcohol play in an individual’s ability to consent;
(C) Information on options relating to the reporting of an  incident of sexual misconduct,
the effects of  each option presented and the methods to report an incident of sexual mis-
conduct, including confidential and anonymous disclosure;
(D) Information on the  institution’s procedures for resolving sexual misconduct reports
and the range of sanctions or penalties the institution may impose  on students and employ-
ees responsible for a violation;
(E) The name, contact information and  role of the certified advocate employed by the
institution;
(F) Strategies for bystander intervention and risk reduction; and
(G) Opportunities for  ongoing sexual misconduct prevention and awareness training and
programming.
(3) Notwithstanding section 1 (5) of this 2023 Act, as  used in this section, “student”
means an individual who is enrolled at least half-time in an academic credit-bearing  program
at an institution of higher education.
SECTION 10.
(1) Each institution of higher education shall waive  any requirements re-
lating to a minimum  required grade point average or disciplinary record requirements re-
quired to demonstrate academic success that are part of an institution-sponsored  program
or activity identified by the institution under subsection (2) of this section  for any partic-
ipant who:
(a) Has experienced sexual misconduct; and
(b) Has received a waiver in the manner described in subsection (3) of this section.
(2)(a) Each institution of higher  education shall identify the institution-sponsored pro-
grams or activities that a waiver granted under this section shall apply to.
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 8
(b) A student must obtain a separate  waiver under this section for each institution-
sponsored program or activity.
(3) A student may obtain a waiver under  this section from the certified advocate em-
ployed by the institution, the Title IX coordinator at the institution, a student basic needs
coordinator at the institution, any  law enforcement personnel at the institution, the
student’s academic advisor at the institution or any disability resource center personnel.
(4) Each institution of higher  education shall maintain confidentiality of all materials
that contain personally identifiable information for individuals who  have requested a waiver
under this section unless disclosure  is required specifically for the purpose of making re-
quired accommodations or if otherwise required by a court of law.
(5) As  used in this section, “institution-sponsored program or activity” includes but is
not limited to a scholarship provided by an institution of higher education or an  institution-
sponsored academic or extracurricular activity.
SECTION 11. (1) No later than October 1  of each year, each institution of higher educa-
tion shall submit a report in the manner provided by ORS 192.245 to:
(a) The Secretary of the Senate and the Chief Clerk of the House of Representatives;
(b) The interim committees of the Legislative Assembly relating to higher education;
(c) The Higher Education Coordinating Commission; and
(d) The Director of Human Services.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, the report shall include:
(a) The total number  of allegations of intimate partner violence, domestic violence, sex-
ual assault, sexual harassment and stalking that were reported to the institution’s Title  IX
coordinator by a student or employee of  the institution against another student or employee
of the institution during the previous academic year;
(b) The number of law enforcement investigations known to  have been initiated during
the previous academic year in response to reports of sexual misconduct  that were brought
forward by a student or  employee of the institution against another student or employee of
the institution;
(c) The number of students and employees at the institution  who were found responsible
during the previous  academic year for violating the institution’s policies prohibiting sexual
misconduct;
(d) The number of students  and employees at the institution who during the previous
academic year, faced academic  or employment disciplinary action due to having violated the
institution’s policies prohibiting sexual misconduct;
(e) The number of students and employees at the institution who, during the previous
academic year, were  investigated, but found not responsible for having violated the
institution’s policies prohibiting sexual misconduct;
(f) The number  of students at the institution who, during the previous academic year,
requested supportive measures;
(g) The number of  supportive measures requested by each student described in paragraph
(f) of this subsection;
(h) The number of supported measures granted to each student described in  paragraph
(f) of this subsection; and
(i) The number of students during the previous academic year  who took a leave of ab-
sence, transferred to a different institution of higher education or withdrew  from the insti-
tution of higher education.
(3) A report submitted by a community college operated under ORS chapter 341 or  a ca-
reer school as defined in ORS 345.010 is not required to include the information described in
subsection (2)(i) of this section.
(4) The information provided in the report must be provided in an anonymous and  ag-
gregate manner that complies with all state and federal privacy laws.
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 9
SECTION 12. (1) No later than September 15 of each year, the  Higher Education Coordi-
nating Commission shall submit a report in the manner provided  by ORS 192.245 to the in-
terim committees of the Legislative Assembly related  to higher education that identifies
each instance during the previous academic year in which an institution  of higher education
has either violated a provision of sections 1  to 12 of this 2023 Act or failed to carry out a
provision of sections 1 to 12 of this 2023 Act.
(2) The commission may adopt rules necessary to implement sections  1 to 12 of this 2023
Act.
SECTION 13. The Sexual Misconduct  Survey Council must submit the first base survey
and related  recommendations, including but not limited to recommendations on achieving
statistically valid response rates, to each institution of higher education no  later than Jan-
uary 1, 2024.
SECTION 14. Sections 1 to 12 of this 2023 Act first apply to the 2023-2024  academic year.
SECTION 15. It is the  intent of the Legislative Assembly that all parts of this 2023 Act
are independent and that if  any part of this 2023 Act is held unconstitutional, all remaining
parts shall remain in force.
SECTION 16. In addition to and not in lieu of any  other appropriation, there is appro-
priated to the Higher Education Coordinating Commission,  for the biennium beginning July
1, 2023, out of the General  Fund, the amount of $1,122,544, to establish and provide staff
support to the Sexual Misconduct Survey Council, and to conduct  rulemaking for the col-
lection, analysis and distribution of the sexual misconduct climate survey results.
SECTION 17. This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation  of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
on its passage.
Passed by House June 14, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 23, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 3456 (HB 3456-B) Page 10